Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 59.1-501.7.
Legal recognition of electronic record and authentication; use of electronic agents.

A record or authentication may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.

This chapter does not require that a record or authentication be generated, stored, sent, received, or otherwise processed by electronic means or in electronic form.

In any transaction, a person may establish requirements regarding the type of authentication or record acceptable to that person.

A person using an electronic agent that he has selected for making an authentication, performance, or agreement, including manifestation of assent, is bound by the operations of the electronic agent, even if no individual was aware of or reviewed the
agent’s operations or the results of the operations.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

§ 59.1-501.8.
Proof and effect of authentication.

Authentication may be proven in any manner, including a showing that a party made use of information or access that could have been available only if it engaged in conduct or operations that authenticated the record or term.

Compliance with a commercially reasonable attribution procedure agreed to or adopted by the parties or established by law for authenticating a record authenticates the record as a matter of law.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-501.9.
Choice of law.

The parties in their agreement may choose the applicable law. However, the choice is not enforceable in a consumer contract to the extent it would vary a statute, administrative rule, or regulation that may not be varied by agreement under the law of
Virginia.

In the absence of an enforceable agreement on choice of law, the contract is governed by the law of Virginia.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996; 2001, cc. 762, 763.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 762 substituted “statute, administrative rule, or regulation” for “rule” in subsection (a).

The 2001 amendment by c. 763 substituted “statute, rule, or regulation” for “rule” in subsection (a).

The section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 13-527 Choice of Law.

§ 59.1-501.10.
Contractual choice of forum.

The parties in their agreement may choose an exclusive judicial forum unless the choice is unreasonable or unjust.

A judicial forum specified in an agreement is not exclusive unless the agreement expressly so provides and, in a mass-market transaction, expressly and conspicuously so provides.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996; 2001, c. 763.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 763 substituted “or unjust” for “and unjust” at the end of subsection (a), and inserted “and, in a mass-market transaction, expressly and conspicuously so provides” at the end of subsection (b).

§ 59.1-501.11.
Unconscionable contract or term.

If a court as a matter of law finds a contract or a term thereof to have been unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable term, or limit the application
of the unconscionable term so as to avoid an unconscionable result.

If a court as a matter of law finds a contract or a term thereof has been induced by unconscionable conduct or that unconscionable conduct has occurred in the collection of a claim arising from the contract, the court may grant appropriate relief.

If it is claimed or appears to the court that a contract or term thereof may be unconscionable, the parties must be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose, and effect to aid the court in making the
determination.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-501.12.
Manifesting assent.

A person manifests assent to a record or term if the person, acting with knowledge of, or after having an opportunity to review the record or term or a copy of it:

authenticates the record or term with intent to adopt or accept it; or

intentionally engages in conduct or makes statements with reason to know that the other party or its electronic agent may infer from the conduct or statement that the person assents to the record or term.

An electronic agent manifests assent to a record or term if, after having an opportunity to review it, the electronic agent:

authenticates the record or term; or

engages in operations that in the circumstances indicate acceptance of the record or term.

If this chapter or other law requires assent to a specific term, a manifestation of assent must relate specifically to the term.

Conduct or operations manifesting assent may be proved in any manner, including showing that a person or an electronic agent obtained or used the information or informational rights and that a procedure existed by which a person or an electronic agent
must have engaged in the conduct or operations in order to do so. Proof of compliance with subsection (a) (2) is sufficient if there is conduct that assents and subsequent conduct that reaffirms assent by electronic means.

The effect of provisions of this section may be modified by an agreement setting out standards applicable to future transactions between the parties.

Providers of online services, network access, and telecommunications services, or the operators of facilities thereof, do not manifest assent to a contractual relationship simply by their provision of these services to other parties, including but not
limited to transmission, routing, or providing connections, linking, caching, hosting, information location tools, or storage of materials at the request or initiation of a person other than the service provider.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996; 2001, c. 763; 2004, c. 794.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 763 added subsection (g).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 794 deleted subsection (e), relating to rules that apply to an opportunity to review and redesignated former subsections (f) and (g) as present subsections (e) and (f).

§ 59.1-501.13.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 794.

Cross references.

For current provisions concerning variation by agreement; commercial practice, see § 59.1-501.15.

§ 59.1-501.13:1.
Opportunity to review.

A person has an opportunity to review a record or term only if it is made available in a manner that ought to call it to the attention of a reasonable person and permit review.

An electronic agent has an opportunity to review a record or term only if it is made available in a manner that would enable a reasonably configured electronic agent to react to the record or term.

If a record or term is available for review only after a person becomes obligated to pay or begins its performance, the person has an opportunity to review only if he has a right to a return if he rejects the record. However, a right to a return is not
required if:

the record proposes a modification of contract or provides particulars of performance under § 59.1-503.5; or

the primary performance is other than delivery or acceptance of a copy, the agreement is not a mass-market transaction, and the parties at the time of contracting had reason to know that a record or term would be presented after performance, use, or access
to the information began.

The right to a return under this section may arise by law or by agreement.

The effect of this section may be modified by an agreement setting out standards applicable to future transactions between the parties.

History.
2004, c. 794.

§ 59.1-501.14.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 794.

Cross references.

For current provisions concerning supplemental principles, good faith, and commercial practice, see § 59.1-501.16.

§ 59.1-501.14:1.
Pretransaction disclosures in Internet-type transactions.

This section applies to a licensor that makes its computer information available to a licensee by electronic means from its Internet or similar electronic site. In such a case, the licensor affords an opportunity to review the terms of a standard form
license, which opportunity satisfies § 59.1-501.13:1 with respect to a licensee that acquires the information from that site, if the licensor:

makes the standard terms of the license readily available for review by the licensee before the information is delivered or the licensee becomes obligated to pay, whichever occurs first, by:

displaying prominently and in close proximity to a description of the computer information, or to instructions or steps for acquiring it, the standard terms or a reference to an electronic location from which they can be readily obtained; or

disclosing the availability of the standard terms in a prominent place on the site from which the computer information is offered and promptly furnishing a copy of the standard terms on request before the transfer of the computer information; and

does not take affirmative acts to prevent printing or storage of the standard terms for archival or review purposes by the licensee.

Failure to provide an opportunity to review under this section does not preclude a person from providing a person an opportunity to review by other means pursuant to § 59.1-501.13:1 or law other than this chapter.

History.
2004, c. 794.

§ 59.1-501.15.
Variation by agreement; commercial practice.

The effect of any provision of this chapter, including an allocation of risk or imposition of a burden, may be varied by agreement of the parties.

The following rules are not variable by agreement:

Obligations of good faith, diligence, reasonableness, and care imposed by this chapter may not be disclaimed by agreement, but the parties by agreement may determine the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured if the standards
are not manifestly unreasonable;

The limitations on enforceability imposed by unconscionability under § 59.1-501.11 and fundamental public policy under § 59.1-501.5 (b) may not be varied by agreement; and

Limitations on enforceability of, or agreement to, a contract, term, or right expressly stated in the sections listed in the following subsections may not be varied by agreement except to the extent provided in each section:

the limitations on agreed choice of law in § 59.1-501.9 (a);

the limitations on agreed choice of forum in § 59.1-501.10;

the requirements for manifesting assent in § 59.1-501.12 and opportunity for review in § 59.1-501.13:1;

the limitations on enforceability in § 59.1-502.1;

the limitations on a mass-market license in § 59.1-502.9;

the consumer defense arising from an electronic error in § 59.1-502.14;

the requirements for an enforceable term in §§ 59.1-503.3 (b), 59.1-503.7 (f), 59.1-504.6 (b) and (c), and 59.1-508.4 (a);

the requirements of § 59.1-503.4 (b) (2);

the limitations on a financier in §§ 59.1-505.7 through 59.1-505.11;

the restrictions on altering the period of limitations in § 59.1-508.5 (a) and (b); and

the limitations on self-help repossession in §§ 59.1-508.15 (b) and 59.1-508.16.

History.
2004, c. 794.

§ 59.1-501.16.
Supplemental principles; good faith; commercial practice.

Unless displaced by this chapter, principles of law and equity, including the merchant law and the common law of the Commonwealth relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, and
other validating or invalidating cause, supplement this chapter. Among the laws supplementing and not displaced by this chapter are trade secret laws and unfair competition laws, including application of such laws as they may deal
with failure to disclose defects.

Every contract or duty within the scope of this chapter imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

Any usage of trade in the vocation or trade in which the parties are engaged or of which the parties are or should be aware and any course of dealing or course of performance between the parties are relevant to determining the existence or meaning of
an agreement.

History.
2004, c. 794.

§ 59.1-501.17.
Decision for court; legal consequences; reasonable time; reason to know.

Whether a term is conspicuous or is unenforceable under §§ 59.1-501.5 (a) or (b), 59.1-501.11, or § 59.1-502.9 (a) and whether an attribution procedure is commercially reasonable or effective under §§ 59.1-501.8, 59.1-502.12, or § 59.1-502.13 are questions
to be determined by the court.

Whether an agreement has legal consequences is determined by this chapter.

Whenever this chapter requires any action to be taken within a reasonable time, what is a reasonable time for taking the action depends on the nature, purpose, and circumstances of the action. Any time that is not manifestly unreasonable may be fixed
by agreement.

A person has reason to know a fact if the person has knowledge of the fact or, from all the facts and circumstances known to the person without investigation, the person should be aware that the fact exists.

History.
2004, c. 794.

§§ 59.1-501.18 through 59.1-502.
Reserved.